ro-RO: Metodă de monitorizare: Interstițial continuu (CGM); Sânge capilar din deget; Optic/laser non-invaziv; Altele
tr: İzleme yöntemi: Sürekli interstisyel (CGM); Parmak delme kılcal kan; İnvaziv olmayan optik/lazer; Diğer
bg-BG: Метод за мониторинг: Непрекъснат интерстициален (CGM); Капилярна кръв от пръст; Неинвазивен оптичен/лазерен; Други
sv: Övervakningsmetod: Kontinuerlig interstitiell (CGM); Fingerstick kapillärblod; Icke-invasiv optisk/laser; Övrigt
da: Overvågningsmetode: Kontinuerlig interstitiel (CGM); Fingerprik kapillærblod; Non-invasiv optisk/laser; Andet
zh-TW: 監測方法: 連續組織間（連續血糖監測）; 指尖採血毛細血管血; 非侵入式光學/雷射; 其他
ru: Метод мониторинга: Непрерывный интерстициальный (CGM); Капиллярная кровь из пальца; Неинвазивный оптический/лазерный; Другой
sl-SI: Metoda spremljanja: Neprekinjen intersticijski (CGM); Kapilarna kri iz prsta; Neinvazivni optični/laserski; Drugo
th: วิธีการตรวจสอบ: การติดตามต่อเนื่องระหว่างเนื้อเยื่อ (ซีจีเอ็ม); เลือดฝอยจากปลายนิ้ว; แบบไม่รุกล้ำด้วยแสง/เลเซอร์; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Método de monitoramento: Intersticial contínuo (MCG); Sangue capilar por punção digital; Óptico/laser não invasivo; Outro
pt-PT: Método de monitorização: Intersticial contínuo (CGM); Sangue capilar por picada no dedo; Ótico/laser não invasivo; Outro
sk-SK: Monitorovacia metóda: Kontinuálny intersticiálny (CGM); Odber kapilárnej krvi z prsta; Neinvazívny optický/laserový; Iné
zh-CN: 监测方法: 持续间质监测 (CGM); 指尖毛细血管血液; 无创光学/激光; 其他
pl: Metoda monitorowania: Ciągłe monitorowanie śródmiąższowe (CGM); Nakłucie palca - krew włośniczkowa; Nieinwazyjny optyczny/laserowy; Inne
vi: Phương pháp theo dõi: Liên tục kẽ (CGM); Máu mao mạch đầu ngón tay; Quang học/laser không xâm lấn; Khác
fi: Seurantamenetelmä: Jatkuva kudosnestemittaus (CGM); Sormenpään kapillaariveri; Ei-invasiivinen optinen/laser; Muu
el: Μέθοδος παρακολούθησης: Συνεχής διάμεσος (CGM); Τριχοειδές αίμα δακτύλου; Μη επεμβατικό οπτικό/λέιζερ; Άλλο
nl: Monitoringmethode: Continue interstitiële (CGM); Vingerprik capillair bloed; Niet-invasief optisch/laser; Andere
lt-LT: Stebėjimo metodas: Nepertraukiamas tarpląstelinis (CGM); Piršto dūrio kapiliarinis kraujas; Neinvazinis optinis/lazerinis; Kita
cs: Monitorovací metoda: Kontinuální intersticiální (CGM); Kapilární krev z prstu; Neinvazivní optický/laserový; Jiné
de: Überwachungsmethode: Kontinuierlich interstitiell (CGM); Fingerstich-Kapillarblut; Nicht-invasiv optisch/Laser; Sonstiges
ja: モニタリング方法: 持続間質液測定（CGM）; 指先穿刺毛細血管血; 非侵襲性光学/レーザー; その他
hu: Megfigyelési módszer: Folyamatos intersticiális (CGM); Ujjbegyből vett kapilláris vér; Nem invazív optikai/lézer; Egyéb
en: Monitoring method: Continuous interstitial (CGM); Finger-stick capillary blood; Non-invasive optical/laser; Other
it: Metodo di monitoraggio: Interstiziale continuo (CGM); Puntura del dito capillare; Ottico/laser non invasivo; Altro
fr: Méthode de suivi: Interstitiel continu (CGM); Sang capillaire au doigt; Optique/laser non invasif; Autre
ko: 모니터링 방법: 연속 간질 (CGM); 손가락 천자 모세혈; 비침습적 광학/레이저; 기타
nb: Overvåkingsmetode: Kontinuerlig interstitiell (CGM); Fingerstikk kapillærblod; Ikke-invasiv optisk/laser; Annet
hr-HR: Metoda praćenja: Kontinuirano intersticijsko (CGM); Kapilarna krv iz prsta; Neinvazivno optičko/lasersko; Ostalo
es: Método de monitoreo: Intersticial continuo (MCG); Punción capilar en el dedo; Óptico/láser no invasivo; Otros